Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 3. Miscellaneous

§ 2011.
Perjury before board making checklist.

A person who knowingly swears falsely to a fact or matter that may be the subject of inquiry by the board of civil authority or town clerk in revising the checklist as provided in this title shall be guilty of perjury and imprisoned not more than 15 years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

1981, No. 223

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2012.
Procuring change in list wrongfully.

A person who, directly or indirectly, procures or causes to be procured or aids in procuring the name of a person to be inserted on a checklist of voters, knowing such person not to be a voter in the political subdivision for which such list is made or, directly or indirectly, procures or causes to be procured or aids in procuring the name of a person to be erased from such list, knowing him or her to be a legal voter in such political subdivision, shall be fined not more than $200.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2013.
False answer as to right to vote.

A person who knowingly gives a false answer or information to the presiding officer at a local, primary, or general election or to the authority present to decide upon the qualifications of voters, touching a person’s right to vote at such election, shall be fined not more than $200.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2014.
Unqualified person voting.

A person, knowing that he or she is not a qualified voter, who votes at a local, primary, or general election for an officer to be elected at that election shall be fined not more than $200.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2015.
Fraudulent voting.

A person who personates another, living or dead, and gives or offers to give a vote in the name of that other person or gives or offers to give a vote under a fictitious name at a local, primary, or general election for an officer to be elected at that election shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $200.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 223

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2016.
Aiding unqualified voter to vote.

A person who willfully aids or abets a person who is not a duly qualified voter in voting or attempting to vote at a local, primary, or general election shall be fined not more than $200.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2017.
Undue influence.

A person who attempts by bribery, threats, or any undue influence to dictate, control, or alter the vote of a voter about to be given at a local, primary, or general election shall be fined not more than $200.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2019, No. 67

, § 5.

§ 2018.
Repealed. 2013, No. 161 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2019.
Destroying lists; hindering voting.

A person who, prior to a local, primary, or general election, willfully defaces or destroys any list of candidates posted in accordance with law or, during that election, willfully defaces, tears down, removes, or destroys any card posted for the instruction of voters or, during that election, willfully removes or destroys any of the supplies or conveniences furnished to enable a voter to prepare his or her ballot or willfully hinders the voting of others shall be fined $200.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2020.
Repealed. 2013, No. 161 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2021.
Destruction of or fraudulent acts pertaining to primary election documents; alteration or delay of ballots.

A person who falsely makes or willfully defaces or destroys a primary petition, certificate of nomination, or nomination paper or any part thereof, or any letter of assent or of withdrawal, or who files a primary petition, certificate of nomination, nomination paper, letter of assent, or letter of withdrawal knowing the same or any part thereof to be falsely made, or who suppresses a primary petition, certificate of nomination, nomination paper, letter of assent, or letter of withdrawal or any part thereof that has been filed, or forges or falsely makes the official endorsement upon a ballot to be used at a primary or at an election or willfully destroys or defaces such a ballot or willfully delays the delivery of such ballots shall be fined $200.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2022.
Repealed. 1997, No. 64, § 21.